Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1232.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3.1(a) of the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act, is amended to read:Section 3.1. State Board of Psychology.--(a) The State Board of Psychology shall consist of nine members [who are citizens of the United States and] who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a three-year period. Eight members are to be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, and the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs shall serve as the ninth member of the board. Two members shall be appointed as representatives of the public at large. Six members 12345678910111213141516171819 shall be appointed who shall hold current valid licenses to practice psychology in this Commonwealth and shall be broadly representative of the practice areas of psychology.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1232PN1448 - 2 - 12345